test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k28_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dráttur
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dráttur
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dráttri
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dráttrar
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dráttrir
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dráttrir
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dráttrum
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dráttra
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: drátturin
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: drátturin
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dráttrinum
    dráttur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dráttrarins
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dráttrirnir
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dráttrirnar
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dráttrunum
    dráttur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dráttranna
